North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 16. Postmortem Investigation and Disposition.

Part 1. Postmortem Medicolegal Examinations and Services.

§ 130A-377.
Establishment and maintenance of central and district offices.

The Department shall establish and maintain a central office with appropriate facilities and personnel for postmortem medicolegal examinations. District offices, with appropriate facilities and personnel, may also be established and maintained if considered
necessary by the Department for the proper management of postmortem examinations.

History.
1955, c. 972, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1967, c. 1154, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-378.
Qualifications and appointment of the Chief Medical Examiner.

The Chief Medical Examiner shall be a forensic pathologist certified by the American Board of Pathology and licensed to practice medicine. The Chief Medical Examiner shall be appointed by the Secretary.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-379.
Duties of the Chief Medical Examiner.

The Chief Medical Examiner shall perform postmortem medicolegal examinations as provided in this Part. The Chief Medical Examiner may, upon request, provide instruction in health science, legal medicine and other subjects related to his duties at The
University of North Carolina, the North Carolina Justice Academy and other institutions of higher learning.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-380.
The Chief Medical Examiner’s staff.

The Chief Medical Examiner may employ qualified pathologists to serve as Associate and Assistant Medical Examiners in the central and district offices. The Associate and Assistant Medical Examiners shall perform duties assigned by the Chief Medical Examiner.
Forensic chemists may be employed by the Chief Medical Examiner to provide toxicological and related support.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-381.
Additional services and facilities.

In order to provide proper facilities for investigating deaths as authorized in this Part, the Chief Medical Examiner may arrange for the use of existing public or private laboratory facilities. Each county shall provide or contract for an appropriate
facility for the examination and storage of bodies under Medical Examiner jurisdiction. The Chief Medical Examiner may contract with qualified persons to perform or to provide support services for autopsies and other studies and investigations.

History.
1967, c. 1154, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2007-187, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-187, s. 5, effective July 8, 2007, inserted the second sentence.

§ 130A-382.
County medical examiners; appointment; term of office; vacancies; training requirements; revocation for cause.

The Chief Medical Examiner shall appoint two or more county medical examiners for each county for a three-year term. In appointing medical examiners for each county, the Chief Medical Examiner shall give preference to physicians licensed to practice medicine
in this State but may also appoint licensed physician assistants, nurse practitioners, nurses, or emergency medical technician paramedics. A medical examiner may serve more than one county. The Chief Medical Examiner may take jurisdiction
in any case or appoint another medical examiner to do so.

County medical examiners shall complete continuing education training as directed by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner and based upon established and published guidelines for conducting death investigations. The continuing education training shall
include training regarding sudden unexpected death in epilepsy. The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall annually update and publish these guidelines on its Internet Web site. Newly appointed county medical examiners shall
complete mandatory orientation training as directed by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner within 90 days of their appointment.

The Chief Medical Examiner may revoke a county medical examiner’s appointment for failure to adequately perform the duties of the office after providing the county medical examiner with written notice of the basis for the revocation and an opportunity
to respond.

History.
1955, c. 972, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1963, c. 492, s. 4; 1967, c. 1154, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 187, ss. 2-4; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2007-187, s. 4; 2014-100, s. 12E.6(a); 2015-211, s. 1.

§ 130A-383.
Medical examiner jurisdiction.

Upon the death of any person resulting from violence, poisoning, accident, suicide or homicide; occurring suddenly when the deceased had been in apparent good health or when unattended by a physician; occurring in a jail, prison, correctional institution
or in police custody; occurring in State facilities operated in accordance with Part 5 of Article 4 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes; occurring pursuant to Article 19 of Chapter 15 of the General Statutes; or occurring under
any suspicious, unusual or unnatural circumstance, the medical examiner of the county in which the body of the deceased is found shall be notified by a physician in attendance, hospital employee, law-enforcement officer, funeral
home employee, emergency medical technician, relative or by any other person having suspicion of such a death. No person shall disturb the body at the scene of such a death until authorized by the medical examiner unless in the
unavailability of the medical examiner it is determined by the appropriate law enforcement agency that the presence of the body at the scene would risk the integrity of the body or provide a hazard to the safety of others. For
the limited purposes of this Part, expression of opinion that death has occurred may be made by a nurse, an emergency medical technician or any other competent person in the absence of a physician.

The discovery of anatomical material suspected of being part of a human body shall be reported to the medical examiner of the county in which the material is found.

Upon completion of the investigation and in accordance with the rules of the Commission, the medical examiner shall release the body to the next of kin or other interested person who will assume responsibility for final disposition.

History.
1955, c. 972, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1963, c. 492, s. 4; 1967, c. 1154, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1989, c. 353, s. 1; 2008-131, s. 2.

Local Modification to Former G.S. 130-198.

Bladen: 1989, c. 267, s. 2; Cleveland: 1977, c. 189; Rutherford: 1977, c. 189.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-131, s. 2, effective July 28, 2008, inserted “occurring in State facilities operated in accordance with Part 5 of Article 4 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

§ 130A-384.
Notification concerning out-of-state body.

When a body is brought into this State for disposal and there is reason to believe either that the death was not investigated properly or that there is not an adequate certificate of death, the body shall be reported to a medical examiner in the county
where the body resides or to the Chief Medical Examiner. These deaths may be investigated by the same procedure as deaths occurring in this State under

G.S. 130A-383

.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-385.
Duties of medical examiner upon receipt of notice; reports; copies.

Upon receipt of a notification under

G.S. 130A-383

, the medical examiner shall take charge of the body, make inquiries regarding the cause and manner of death, reduce the findings to writing and promptly make a full report to the Chief Medical Examiner on forms
prescribed for that purpose.The Chief Medical Examiner or the county medical examiner is authorized to inspect and copy the medical records of the decedent whose death is under investigation. In addition, in an investigation conducted
pursuant to this Article, the Chief Medical Examiner or the county medical examiner is authorized to inspect all physical evidence and documents which may be relevant to determining the cause and manner of death of the person whose
death is under investigation, including decedent’s personal possessions associated with the death, clothing, weapons, tissue and blood samples, cultures, medical equipment, X rays and other medical images. The Chief Medical Examiner
or county medical examiner is further authorized to seek an administrative search warrant pursuant to

G.S. 15-27.2

for the purpose of carrying out the duties imposed under this Article. In addition to the requirements of

G.S. 15-27.2

, no administrative search warrant shall be issued pursuant to this section unless the Chief Medical Examiner or county medical examiner submits an affidavit from the office of the district attorney in the district
in which death occurred stating that the death in question is not under criminal investigation.The Chief Medical Examiner shall provide directions as to the nature, character and extent of an investigation and appropriate forms
for the required reports. The facilities of the central and district offices and their staff services shall be available to the medical examiners and designated pathologists in their investigations.

The medical examiner shall complete a certificate of death, stating the name of the disease which in his opinion caused death. If the death was from external causes, the medical examiner shall state on the certificate of death the means of death, and
whether, in the medical examiner’s opinion, the manner of death was accident, suicide, homicide, execution by the State, or undetermined. The medical examiner shall also furnish any information as may be required by the State Registrar
of Vital Statistics in order to properly classify the death.

The Chief Medical Examiner shall have authority to amend a medical examiner death certificate.

A copy of the report of the medical examiner investigation may be forwarded to the appropriate district attorney.

In cases where death occurred due to an injury received in the course of the decedent’s employment, the Chief Medical Examiner shall forward to the Commissioner of Labor a copy of the medical examiner’s report of the investigation, including the location
of the fatal injury and the name and address of the decedent’s employer at the time of the fatal injury. The Chief Medical Examiner shall forward this report within 30 days of receipt of the information from the medical examiner.

If a death occurred in a facility licensed subject to Article 2 or Article 3 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, or Articles 1 or 1A of Chapter 131D of the General Statutes, and the deceased was a client or resident of the facility or a recipient
of facility services at the time of death, then the Chief Medical Examiner shall forward a copy of the medical examiner’s report to the Secretary of Health and Human Services within 30 days of receipt of the report from the medical
examiner.

History.
1955, c. 972, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1967, c. 1154, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1145; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1989, c. 353, s. 2; c. 797; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 894, s. 6; 2000-129, s. 4.

§ 130A-386.
Subpoena authority.

The Chief Medical Examiner and the county medical examiners are authorized to issue subpoenas for the attendance of persons and for the production of documents as may be required by their investigation.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-387.
Fees.

For each investigation and prompt filing of the required report, the medical examiner shall receive a fee paid by the State. However, if the deceased is a resident of the county in which the death or fatal injury occurred, that county shall pay the fee.
The fee shall be two hundred dollars ($200.00).

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1991, c. 463, s. 1; 2005-368, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 12E.6(a).

§ 130A-388.
Medical examiner’s permission necessary before embalming, burial and cremation.

No person knowing or having reason to know that a death may be under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner pursuant to

G.S. 130A-383

or 130A-384, shall embalm, bury or cremate the body without the permission of the medical examiner.

A dead body shall not be cremated or buried at sea unless a medical examiner certifies that he has inquired into the cause and the manner of death and has the opinion that no further examination is necessary. This subsection shall not apply to deaths
occurring less than 24 hours after birth or to deaths of patients resulting only from natural disease and occurring in a licensed hospital unless the death falls within the jurisdiction of the medical examiner under

G.S. 130A-383

or 130A-384. The Commission is authorized to adopt rules creating additional exceptions to this subsection. For making this certification, the medical examiner shall be entitled to a fee in an amount determined reasonable
and appropriate by the Secretary, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00), to be paid by the applicant.

History.
1955, c. 972, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1963, c. 492, s. 4; 1967, c. 1154, s. 1; 1971, c. 444, s. 7; 1973, c. 873, s. 7; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-389.
Autopsies.

If, in the opinion of the medical examiner investigating the case or of the Chief Medical Examiner, it is advisable and in the public interest that an autopsy or other study be made; or, if an autopsy or other study is requested by the district attorney
of the county or by any superior court judge, an autopsy or other study shall be made by the Chief Medical Examiner or by a competent pathologist designated by the Chief Medical Examiner. A complete autopsy report of findings and
interpretations, prepared on forms designated for the purpose, shall be submitted promptly to the Chief Medical Examiner. Subject to the limitations of

G.S. 130A-389.1

relating to photographs and video or audio recordings of an autopsy, a copy of the report shall be furnished to any person upon request. The fee for the autopsy or other study shall be two thousand eight hundred
dollars ($2,800) to be paid as follows:

Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the county in which the deceased resided shall pay a fee of one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750) and the State shall pay the remaining balance of one thousand fifty dollars ($1,050).

If the death or fatal injury occurred outside the county in which the deceased resided, the State shall pay the entire fee in the amount of two thousand eight hundred dollars ($2,800).

In deaths where the Chief Medical Examiner and the medical examiner investigating the case do not deem it advisable and in the public interest that an autopsy be performed, but the next-of-kin of the deceased requests that an autopsy be performed, the
Chief Medical Examiner or a designated pathologist may perform the autopsy, unless the deceased’s health care power of attorney granted authority for such decisions to the health care agent. If the Chief Medical Examiner or a designated
pathologist performs the autopsy at the request of the next of kin, the cost shall be paid by the next of kin.

When the next-of-kin of a decedent whose death does not fall under

G.S. 130A-383

or 130A-384 requests that an autopsy be performed, the Chief Medical Examiner or a designated pathologist may perform that autopsy and the cost shall be paid by the next-of-kin.

The report of autopsies performed pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) shall be a part of the decedents’ medical records and therefore not public records open to inspection.

History.
1955, c. 972, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1967, c. 1154, s. 1; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 9; 1981, c. 187, s. 7; c. 562, p. 5; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1991, c. 463, s. 2; 1998-212, s. 29A.10(a); 2005-351, s.
4; 2005-393, s. 2; 2006-226, s. 32; 2013-360, s. 12E.8(a); 2015-241, s. 12E.5(a).

§ 130A-389.1.
Photographs and video or audio recordings made pursuant to autopsy.

Except as otherwise provided by law, any person may inspect and examine original photographs or video or audio recordings of an autopsy performed pursuant to G.S. 130A-389(a) at reasonable times and under reasonable supervision of the custodian of the
photographs or recordings. Except as otherwise provided by this section, no custodian of the original recorded images shall furnish copies of photographs or video or audio recordings of an autopsy to the public. For purposes of
this section, the Chief Medical Examiner shall be the custodian of all autopsy photographs or video or audio recordings unless the photographs or recordings were taken by or at the direction of an investigating medical examiner
and the investigating medical examiner retains the original photographs or recordings. If the investigating medical examiner has retained the original photographs or recordings, then the investigating medical examiner is the custodian
of the photographs or video or audio recordings and must allow the public to inspect and examine them in accordance with this subsection.

The following public officials may obtain copies of autopsy photographs or video or audio recordings for official use only. These public officials shall not disclose the photographs or video or audio recordings to the public except as provided by law:

The Chief Medical Examiner or a pathologist designated by the Chief Medical Examiner.

Investigating Medical Examiner.

District attorney.

Superior court judge.

Law enforcement officials conducting an investigation relating to the death.

A public official authorized by this subsection to obtain copies may provide a copy of the photograph or videotape to another person for the sole purpose of aiding in the identification of the deceased through publication of the photograph or videotape.

The following persons may obtain copies of autopsy photographs or video or audio recordings but may not disclose the photographs or video or audio recordings to the public unless otherwise authorized by law:

The personal representative of the estate of the deceased.

A person authorized by an order issued in a special proceeding pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.

A physician licensed to practice in North Carolina who uses a copy of the photographs or video or audio recording to confer with attorneys or others with a bona fide professional need to use or understand forensic science, provided that the physician
promptly returns the copy to the custodian.

After redacting all information identifying the decedent, including name, address, and social security number, and after anonymizing any physical recognition, a medical examiner, coroner, physician, or their designee who uses such material for:

Medical or scientific teaching or training purposes;

Teaching or training of law enforcement personnel;

Teaching or training of attorneys or others with a bona fide professional need to use or understand forensic science;

Conferring with medical or scientific experts in the field of forensic science; or

Publication in a scientific or medical journal or textbook.

A medical examiner, coroner, or physician who has in good faith complied with this subsection shall not be subject to any penalty under this section.

Any person who lawfully obtains a copy of a photograph or video or audio recording pursuant to this subsection shall be required to sign a statement acknowledging that they have received notice that any unauthorized disclosure of the photograph or video
or audio recording is a Class 2 misdemeanor.

A person who is denied access to copies of photographs or video or audio recordings, or who is restricted in the use the person may make of the photographs or video or audio recordings under this section, may commence a special proceeding in accordance
with Article 33 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes. Upon a showing of good cause, the clerk may issue an order authorizing the person to copy or disclose a photograph or video or audio recording of an autopsy and may prescribe
any restrictions or stipulations that the clerk deems appropriate. In determining good cause, the clerk shall consider whether the disclosure is necessary for the public evaluation of governmental performance; the seriousness of
the intrusion into the family’s right to privacy and whether the disclosure is the least intrusive means available; and the availability of similar information in other public records, regardless of form. In all cases, the viewing,
copying, listening to, or other handling of a photograph or video or audio recording of an autopsy shall be under the direct supervision of the Chief Medical Examiner or the Chief Medical Examiner’s designee. A party aggrieved
by an order of the clerk may appeal to the appropriate court in accordance with Article 27A of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes.

The petitioner shall provide reasonable notice of the commencement of a special proceeding, as authorized by subsection (d) of this section, and reasonable notice of the opportunity to be present and heard at any hearing on the matter in accordance with
Rule 5 of the Rules of Civil Procedure. The notice shall be provided to the personal representative of the estate of the deceased, if any, and to the surviving spouse of the deceased. If there is no surviving spouse, then the notice
shall be provided to the deceased’s parents, and if the deceased has no living parent, then to the adult child of the deceased or to the guardian or custodian of a minor child of the deceased.

This section does not apply to the use of autopsy photographs or video or audio recordings in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding except that nothing in this section prohibits a court or presiding officer, upon good cause shown, from restricting
or otherwise controlling the disclosure to persons other than the parties and attorneys to the proceeding of an autopsy, crime scene, or similar photograph or video or audio recordings in the manner provided under this section.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates this section is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, provided that more than one disclosure of the same item by the same person is not a separate offense.

Any person not authorized by this section to obtain a copy of an autopsy photograph or video or audio recording, who knowingly and willfully removes, copies, or otherwise creates an image of an autopsy photograph or video or audio recording with intent
to steal the same, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.
2005-393, s. 3.

§ 130A-390.
Exhumations.

In any case of death described in

G.S. 130A-383

or 130A-384 where the body is buried without investigation by a medical examiner as to the cause and manner of death or where sufficient cause develops for further investigation after a body is buried as determined
by a county medical examiner or the Chief Medical Examiner, the Chief Medical Examiner shall authorize an investigation and send a report of the investigation with recommendations to the appropriate district attorney. The district
attorney may forward the report to the superior court judge and petition for disinterment. The judge may order that the body be exhumed and that an autopsy be performed by the Chief Medical Examiner. A report of the autopsy and
other pathological studies shall be delivered to the judge. The cost of the exhumation, autopsy, transportation and disposition of the body shall be paid by the State. However, if the deceased is a resident of the county in which
death or fatal injury occurred, that county shall pay the cost.

Any person may petition a judge of the superior court for an order of exhumation. Upon showing of sufficient cause, the judge may order the body exhumed. The cost incurred shall be assigned to the petitioner.

Without applying for a judicial exhumation order, the next-of-kin of a deceased person may have the remains exhumed, examined by the Chief Medical Examiner and redisposed. The cost shall be paid by the next-of-kin.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1991, c. 463, s. 3.

§ 130A-391.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2008-153, s. 3, effective August 2, 2008.

§ 130A-392.
Reports and records as evidence.

Reports of investigations made by a county medical examiner or by the Chief Medical Examiner and toxicology and autopsy reports made pursuant to this Part may be received as evidence in any court or other proceeding. Copies of records, photographs, laboratory
findings and records in the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, any county medical examiner or designated pathologist, when duly certified, shall have the same evidentiary value as the original.

History.
1967, c. 1154, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 187, s. 8; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-393.
Rules.

The Commission shall adopt rules to carry out the intent and purpose of this Part.

History.
1967, c. 1154, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 614, s. 15; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-394.
Coroner to hold inquests.

In every case requiring the medical examiner to be notified, as provided by

G.S. 130A-383

, the coroner shall be notified by the medical examiner, and the coroner shall hold an inquest and preliminary hearing in those instances as required in

G.S. 152-7

. The coroner shall file a written report of his investigation with the district attorney of the superior court and the medical examiner. The body shall remain in the custody and control of the medical examiner. However,
if a county has abolished the office of coroner pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 152A at a time when Chapter 152A was in effect in the county: (i) The provisions of this Article relating to coroner shall not be applicable to the
county, (ii) the provisions of G.S. 152A-9 shall remain in full force and effect in the county, and (iii) Chapter 152 of the General Statutes shall not be applicable in the county.

History.
1955, c. 972, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1967, c. 1154, s. 1; 1969, c. 299; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 462, s. 1.

§ 130A-395.
Handling and transportation of bodies.

It shall be the duty of the physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 90 attending any person who dies and is known to have smallpox, plague, HIV infection, hepatitis B infection, rabies, or Jakob-Creutzfeldt to provide written notification
to all individuals handling the body of the proper precautions to prevent infection. This written notification shall be provided to funeral service personnel at the time the body is removed from any hospital, nursing home, or other
health care facility. When the patient dies in a location other than a health care facility, the attending physician shall notify the funeral service personnel verbally of the precautions required in subsections (b) and (c) as
soon as the physician becomes aware of the death.

The body of a person who died from smallpox or plague shall not be embalmed. The body shall be enclosed in a strong, tightly sealed outer case which will prevent leakage or escape of odors as soon as possible after death and before the body is removed
from the hospital room, home, building, or other premises where the death occurred. This case shall not be reopened except with the consent of the local health director.

Persons handling bodies of persons who died and were known to have HIV infection, hepatitis B infection, Jakob-Creutzfeldt, or rabies shall be provided written notification to observe blood and body fluid precautions.

History.
1989, c. 698, s. 4.

§§ 130A-396,
130A-397.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. Autopsies.

§ 130A-398.
Limitation on right to perform autopsy.

The right to perform an autopsy shall be limited to those cases in which:

The Chief Medical Examiner or a county medical examiner, acting pursuant to

G.S. 130A-389

, directs that an autopsy be performed;

The Commission of Anatomy, acting pursuant to

G.S. 130A-415

, has given written consent for an autopsy to be performed on an unclaimed body;

A prosecuting officer or district attorney, acting pursuant to

G.S. 15-7

in case of homicide, directs that an autopsy be performed;

The decedent directs in writing prior to death that an autopsy be performed upon the occurrence of the decedent’s death;

(4a)
The health care agent under a health care power of attorney with authority to make decisions with respect to autopsies requests that an autopsy be performed upon the deceased principal;

The personal representative of the estate of the decedent requests that an autopsy be performed upon the decedent; or

Any of the following persons, in order of priority, when persons in prior classes are not available at the time of death, and in the absence of actual notice of contrary indications by the decedent or actual opposition by a member of the same or prior
class, authorizes an autopsy to be performed:

The spouse;

Any adult child or stepchild;

Any parent or stepparents;

Any adult sibling;

A guardian of the person of the decedent at the time of the decedent’s death;

Any relative or person who accepts responsibility for final disposition of the body by other customary and lawful procedures;

Any person under obligation to dispose of the body.

History.
1931, c. 152; 1933, c. 209; 1967, c. 1154, s. 4; 1969, c. 444; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2005-351, s. 5; 2006-226, s. 32.

§ 130A-399.
Postmortem examination of inmates of certain public institutions.

Upon the death of any inmate of an institution maintained by the State, or a city, county, or other political subdivision of the State, for the care of individuals with a sickness, mental illness, or intellectual disability, the administrator of the institution
in which the death occurs may authorize a postmortem examination of the deceased person. The examination shall be of a scope and nature necessary to promote knowledge of the human organism and its disorders.

History.
1943, c. 87, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2018-47, s. 10(a).

§ 130A-400.
Written consent for postmortem examinations required.

An administrator of an institution shall not authorize a postmortem examination described in

G.S. 130A-399

without first securing the written consent of the deceased person’s spouse, one of the next-of-kin or nearest known relative, or other person charged by law with the duty of burial, in the order named and as known. A
copy of the written consent shall be filed in the office of the administrator of the institution where the inmate died.

History.
1943, c. 87, s. 3; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-401.
Postmortem examinations in certain medical schools.

The postmortem examinations and studies authorized by

G.S. 130A-399

may be made in the laboratories of medical schools of colleges and universities on conditions established by the administrator.

History.
1943, c. 87, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

Part 3. Uniform Anatomical Gift Act.

§§ 130A-402 through 130A-412.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-538, s. 3.(b), effective October 1, 2007.

§ 130A-412.3.
Short title.

This Part may be cited as the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.4.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Part:

“Adult” means an individual who is at least 18 years of age.

“Agent” means an individual:

Authorized to make an anatomical gift on the principal’s behalf under a power of attorney for health care; or

Expressly authorized to make an anatomical gift on the principal’s behalf by any other record signed by the principal.

“Anatomical gift” means a donation of all or part of a human body to take effect after the donor’s death for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

“Body part” means an organ, an eye, or tissue of a human being. The term does not include the whole body.

“Decedent” means a deceased individual whose body or body part is or may be the source of an anatomical gift. The term includes a stillborn infant and, subject to restrictions imposed by law other than this Article, a fetus.

“Disinterested witness” means any individual except for the following:

The donor’s: spouse, child, parent, sibling, grandchild, grandparent, or guardian.

An adult who exhibited special care and concern for the donor.

A person to whom an anatomical gift could pass under

G.S. 130A-412.13

.

“Document of gift” means a donor card or other record used to make an anatomical gift. The term includes a statement or symbol on a drivers license, identification card, or donor registry.

“Donor” means an individual whose body or body part is the subject of an anatomical gift.

“Donor registry” means a database that contains records of anatomical gifts and amendments to or revocations of anatomical gifts.

“Drivers license” means a license or permit issued by the North Carolina Department of Transportation, Division of Motor Vehicles, to operate a vehicle, whether or not conditions are attached to the license or permit.

“Eye bank” means an entity that is licensed, accredited, or regulated under federal or state law to engage in the recovery, screening, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of human eyes or portions of human eyes.

“Guardian” means a person appointed by a court to make decisions regarding the support, care, education, health, or welfare of an individual. The term does not include a guardian ad litem.

(12a)
“Health care decision” means any decision made regarding the health care of the prospective donor.

“Hospital” means a facility licensed as a hospital under the law of any state or a facility operated as a hospital by the United States, a state, or a subdivision of a state.

“Identification card” means an identification card issued by the North Carolina Department of Transportation, Division of Motor Vehicles.

“Know” means to have actual knowledge.

“Minor” means an individual who is under 18 years of age.

“Organ procurement organization” means a person designated by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services as an organ procurement organization.

“Parent” means a parent whose parental rights have not been terminated.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or
commercial entity.

“Physician” means an individual authorized to practice medicine or osteopathy under the law of any state.

“Procurement organization” means an eye bank, organ procurement organization, or tissue bank.

“Prospective donor” means an individual who is dead or near death and has been determined by a procurement organization to have a body part that could be medically suitable for transplantation, therapy, research, or education. The term does not include
an individual who has made a refusal.

“Reasonably available” means able to be contacted by a procurement organization without undue effort and willing and able to act in a timely manner consistent with existing medical criteria necessary for the making of an anatomical gift.

“Recipient” means an individual into whose body a decedent’s body part has been or is intended to be transplanted.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Refusal” means a record created under

G.S. 130A-412.9

that expressly states an intent to bar other persons from making an anatomical gift of an individual’s body or body part.

“Sign” means, with the present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Technician” means an individual determined to be qualified to remove or process body parts by an appropriate organization that is licensed, accredited, or regulated under federal or state law. The term includes an enucleator.

“Tissue” means a portion of the human body other than an organ or an eye. The term does not include blood unless the blood is donated for the purpose of research or education.

“Tissue bank” means a person that is licensed, accredited, or regulated under federal or state law to engage in the recovery, screening, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of tissue.

“Transplant hospital” means a hospital that furnishes organ transplants and other medical and surgical specialty services required for the care of transplant patients.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.5.
Applicability.

This act applies to an anatomical gift or amendment to, revocation of, or refusal to make an anatomical gift, whenever made.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.6.
Who may make an anatomical gift before donor’s death.

Subject to

G.S. 130A-412.10

, an anatomical gift of a donor’s body or body part may be made during the life of the donor for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education in the manner provided in

G.S. 130A-412.7

by:

The donor, if the donor is an adult or if the donor is a minor and is:

Emancipated; or

Authorized under State law to apply for a drivers license because the donor is at least 16 years of age;

An agent of the donor to the extent authorized under a power of attorney for health care or other record;

A parent of the donor, if the donor is an unemancipated minor; or

The donor’s guardian.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.